Tennessee, session 114, SB1092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-28-517(a), is amended by
deleting "three (3) days" and substituting "three (3) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1092
003186
- 1 -